Hawaii, session 2025, GM1421.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 657-8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§657-8 Limitation of action for damages based on
construction to improve real property. (a) No action, whether
in contract, tort, statute, or otherwise, to recover damages for
any injury to property, real or personal, or for bodily injury
or wrongful death, arising out of any deficiency or neglect in
the planning, design, construction, supervision and
administering of construction, and observation of construction
relating to an improvement to real property shall be commenced
[more than tw<?- years after t-he- cqugg of action has accrued,—but
-in any event not] more than ten years after the date of
completion of the improvement.
(b) This section shall not be construed to extend any
shorter period of limitation under this chapter, including the
six-year statute of limitations under section 657-1 or the
two-year statute of limitations for damages to persons or
M2025i-i3i3n92 iHiBH420i iCiDiln HiMSHO

Page 2 420
H.B. NO
H.D. 3
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
property under section 657-7, as applicable, subject to the
ten-year statute of repose under subsection (a).
[-ibd-] (c) This section shall not apply to actions for
damages against owners or other persons having an interest in
the real property or improvement based on their negligent
conduct in the repair or maintenance of the improvement or to
actions for damages against surveyors for their own errors in
boundary surveys. [The term "improvement" as -ueod in thio
□ ection ohall have the—eame-ffieafting—as—tn—s-eefeien—507—41 and the
phrase- "date of completion" as-ajood in thio oection shalrl moan
the t-ianc whe-n—there hao been substantial—completion of the
improvement or- the improvement has been abandoned.--The filing
sf—an—affidav-i-b of publication and nofeleo e^—completion ■with—the
•eireait—eeatt—where-^fehe—preperty—is—sitaated—in—eempiianee—with
■seetien—SGT——ohall be prima taeie—evidence of the date at
completion.] An improvement shall be deemed substantially
complete upon the earliest of the following:
(1) The issuance of a certificate of occupancy; or
(2) The filing of an affidavit of publication and notice
of completion within the circuit court of the judicial
2025-3392 HB420 CDl HMSO 2
■IlliiHIHIIIIil

Page 3 420
H.B. NO
H.D. 3
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
circuit where the property is situated in compliance
with section 507-43(f).
If the improvement consists of multiple buildings or
improvements, each building or improvement shall be considered
as a separate improvement for the purpose of determining the
limitations period set forth in this section.
(d) This section shall not be construed to prevent, limit,
or extend any shorter period of limitation applicable to
sureties provided for in any contract or bond or any other
statute, nor to extend or add to the liability of any surety
beyond that for which the surety agreed to be liable by contract
or bond.
[-€^] (e) Nothing in this section shall exclude or limit
the liability provisions as set forth in the products liability
laws.
(f) For the purposes of this section:
"Date of completion" means the time when there has been
substantial completion of the improvement or the improvement has
been abandoned.
"Improvement" has the same meaning as in section 507-41."
2025-3392 HB420 CDl HMSO 3
iniiiiiiiiiiiniiiniii

Page 4
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
SECTION 2. Section 672E-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"[-£•]§672E-3[-3-] Notice of claim of construction defect.
(a) A claimant, no later than ninety days before filing an
action against a contractor, shall serve the contractor with a
written notice of claim. The notice of claim shall [dosc-r-ibe
the claim in -detail end include the results of any teoti-ft^
done. ] j_
(1) State that the claimant asserts a claim against the
contractor for a construction defect in the design,
construction, or remodeling, or any combination
thereof, of a dwelling or premises; and
(2) Describe the claim in detail sufficient to determine
the circumstances constituting the alleged
construction defect and damages resulting from the
construction defect. The description shall
specifically identify the alleged defect or problem;
provided that a general statement that a construction
defect may exist shall be insufficient.
The notice of claim shall not constitute a claim under any
applicable insurance policy and shall not give rise to a duty of
2025-3392 HB420 CDl HMSO
lilllHIlilHIMIIMill

Page 5 420
H.B. NO
H.D. 3
S.D.2
C.D. 1
any insurer to provide a defense under any applicable insurance
policy unless and until the process [set—described in
section 672E-5 is completed. Nothing in this chapter shall in
any way interfere with or alter the rights and obligations of
the parties under any liability policy.
(b) If available to the claimant, the claimant shall
provide to the contractor, with the notice of claim, evidence
that depicts the nature and cause of the construction defect and
the nature and extent of the repairs necessary to repair the
defect, including the following information if obtained by the
claimant; photographs, videotapes, and any testing performed.
[-(^] (c) A contractor served with a written notice of
claim shall serve any other appropriate subcontractor with
notice of the claim. The contractor's notice shall include the
claimant's written notice of claim.
(d) After serving the notice of claim, a claimant
shall give to the contractor reasonable prior notice and an
opportunity to observe if any testing is done."
SECTION 3. Section 672E-4, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
2025-3392 HB420 CDl HMSO 5
IIWIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIHII

Page 6 H.B. NO. iS.,
C.D. 1
"§672E-4 Rejection of claim; opportunity to repair
construction defect. (a) The contractor rejects a claimant's
claim of construction defects by:
(1) Serving the claimant with a written rejection of the
claim; or
(2) Failing to respond pursuant to subsection (b)(1) or
[ (b) (2),] (2) to the notice of claim within thirty
days after service.
(b) The contractor, within thirty days after service of
the notice of claim, shall serve the claimant and any other
contractor that has received the notice of claim with a written
response to the alleged construction defect that:
(1) Offers to settle without inspecting the construction
defect by:
(A) Monetary payment;
(B) Making repairs; or
(C) Both subparagraphs (A) and (B); or
(2) Proposes to inspect the premises of the alleged
construction defect that is the subject of the claim.
(c) Within thirty days following any proposal for
inspection under subsection (b)(2), the claimant shall [provide
2025-3392 HB420 GDI HMSO
BiiiiiiimniPiaiEi

Page 7
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
accoos to;] accept a contractor's proposal to inspect. After
accepting the contractor's proposal to inspect, the claimant and
contractor shall agree on a time and date for the inspection,
which shall occur within thirty days of the claimant's
acceptance of the contractor's proposal to inspect, unless the
claimant and contractor agree to a later date. The claimant
shall provide reasonable access to the dwelling or premises
during normal working hours to:
(1) Inspect the premises;
(2) Document any alleged construction defects; and
(3) Perform any testing required to evaluate the nature,
extent, and cause of the asserted construction defect,
and the nature and extent of any repair or replacement
that may be necessary to remedy the asserted
construction defect;
provided that if the claimant is an association under chapter
514B, the claimant shall have forty-five days to provide [ouch]
access. If access to an individual condominium unit is
necessary, and the association is unable to obtain [s«e4^]
access, then the association shall have a reasonable time to
provide access. If destructive testing is required, the
2025-3392 HB420 CDl HMSO 7

Page 8 H.B. NO.
'^03
C.D. 1
contractor shall give advance notice of tests and return the
premises to its pre-testing condition. If inspection or testing
reveals a condition that requires additional testing to fully
and completely evaluate the nature, cause, and extent of the
construction defect, the contractor shall provide notice to the
claimant of the need for additional testing. The claimant shall
provide additional access to the dwelling or premises. If a
claim is asserted on behalf of owners of multiple dwellings, or
multiple owners of units within a multi-family complex, the
contractor shall be entitled to inspect each of the dwellings or
units.
(d) Inspections and testing performed pursuant to this
section shall be completed within nine months of the
contractor's request to inspect, unless the parties agree or the
court orders otherwise.
(e) Within fourteen days following the inspection
and testing, the contractor shall serve on the claimant a
written:
(1) Offer to fully or partially remedy the construction
defect at no cost to the claimant. [Sueh] The offer
shall include a description of construction necessary
2025-3392 HB420 GDI HMSO f
liiiiiiiiiHiniiinEiiiiigii

Page 9 420
H.B. NO
H.D.3
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
to remedy the construction defect and a timetable for
the completion of the additional construction;
(2) Offer to settle the claim by monetary payment;
(3) Offer for a combination of repairs and monetary,
payment; or
(4) Statement that the contractor will not proceed further
to remedy the construction defect.
(f) Upon receipt of the offer made under subsection (b)(1)
or (e)(1), (2), or (3), the claimant may, within thirty or
forty-five days, whichever applies pursuant to section
672E-5(a), accept the offer and authorize the contractor to
proceed with any repairs offered under subsection (b)(1) or
(e)(1) or (3), or deny the offer.
(g) Any offer of settlement under this section shall
reference this section, and shall state that a claimant's
failure to respond with a written notice of acceptance or
rejection within thirty or forty-five days, whichever applies
pursuant to section 672E-5 (a), shall mean that the offer is
rejected. Failure to serve a written offer or statement under
this section shall be deemed a statement that the contractor
will not proceed further."
2025-3392 HB420 CDl HMSO 9
iiiiiiiiiiniiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 10 H.B. NO.
'^03
C.D. 1
SECTION 4. Section 672E-6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"[-£•] §672E-6 [-J-] Offer of settlement, Any time after
the service of the notice of claim, any party may serve an offer
of settlement.
(b) If the offer is accepted, the parties shall be deemed
to have resolved the claim in whole or in part pursuant to the
offer.
(c) An offer not accepted within the time period required
under section 672E-5, or ten days after service for any
subsequent offers, shall be deemed withdrawn and evidence
thereof [ie] shall not be admissible except to determine
entitlement to recovery of costs. If the judgment or award
obtained in a subsequent proceeding is not more favorable than
the offer, the offeree shall pay the costs incurred by the
offeror after the making of the offer. The fact that an offer
is made and not accepted does not preclude a subsequent offer."
SECTION 5. Section 672E-7, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
" [-E-]§672E-7 [-3-] Mediation. (a) If the parties are unable
to resolve the claim pursuant to section 672E-5 or 672E-6, all
2025-3392 HB420 CDl HMSO 10

Page 11 H.B. NO. JS.3
I . . I . g p 2
C.D. 1
parties shall attempt to resolve the dispute through mediation,
even if mediation is not otherwise ordered or mandated by
contract or by law[—]; provided that the parties shall not be
required to attempt to resolve the dispute through mediation
more than once.
(b) Mediation shall be completed within twelve months of
the filing of the notice of the claim, unless the parties agree
or the court orders otherwise."
SECTION 6. Section 672E-8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"[-£■] §672E-8 [•}•] Statute of limitations on actions
exception. If an applicable statute of limitation or repose
would preclude an action after the notice of claim has been
served but before the dispute is resolved under this chapter,
the claimant may file an action against the contractor but the
action shall be immediately stayed pending the contractor's
opportunity to repair under section 672E-4, or submission of the
dispute to mediation under section 672E-7[—]; provided that no
action shadJ^^e fdl^d pursuarrt t^yii£sechwn jnore tliaji S32£
months before the end of the applicable limitation or repose
period. This section shall not be construed to revive a
2025-3392 HB420 CDl HMSO 11
INBIilllinililllllM

Page 12 420
H.B. NO
H.D. 3
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
statutory period of limitations on actions that have expired
prior to the date on which a claimant's written notice of claim
is served. After the sending of the initial notice of claim, a
claimant and a contractor, by written mutual agreement, may
alter the procedure for the notice of claim under this section."
SECTION 7. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 8. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 9. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-3392 HB420 CDl HMSO 12
liiiiimHiiiiiiiin

H.B. NO.
h“3
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 9th day of July , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 420, HD 3, SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 420, H.D. 3, S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date; April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate